Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1452.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 41, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-191.14, to read: START_STATUTE41-191.14. Cargo theft task force; members; duties; annual report; definitions A. subject to legislative appropriation, The attorney general shall establish a cargo theft task force to combat crimes involving the theft, diversion, embezzlement, unlawful taking or fraudulent acquisition of cargo or freight.  The attorney general shall invite federal, state and local law enforcement agencies to participate in the task force to use the combined skills, expertise and resources of law enforcement personnel more effectively.  The task force shall focus on offenses involving cargo moving in, constituting or affecting interstate or intrastate commerce. B. The task force shall consist of the following members: 1. One full-time: (a) Prosecutor. (b) Paralegal. (c) Support staff member. 2. Six investigators. 3. Any additional law enforcement personnel designated by the attorney general. C. The task force shall: 1. Meet regularly to review investigations and intelligence and to provide updates on ongoing cases to task force members. 2. Investigate, apprehend and recommend for prosecution, as appropriate, individuals or entities that engage in cargo theft or related offenses, including organized or repeat offenders and persons who knowingly facilitate, finance or receive stolen cargo for financial gain. 3. Investigate offenses or violations that are under the attorney general's jurisdiction as prescribed by section 21-422. 4. Review, investigate and recommend for prosecution appropriate cases referred by federal, state or local law enforcement agencies. 5. Coordinate with law enforcement agencies and industry stakeholders to identify emerging cargo theft trends and methods and to recommend prevention strategies. D. On or before July 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, the attorney general shall submit a report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state on the task force's activities.  The report must include all of the following, to the extent applicable: 1. A summary of investigations, prosecutions and enforcement actions taken by the task force. 2. Information regarding trends and patterns related to cargo theft in this state. 3. The amount and type of stolen cargo recovered. 4. The number of cases in which restitution was ordered and the total value of restitution ordered and collected. 5. The value of assets forfeited pursuant to existing law. 6. Any recommendations for legislative or policy action relating to criminal penalties, enforcement tools or interagency coordination to reduce cargo theft and protect the economy of this state. E. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Cargo" means merchandise, goods or wares that are transported or intended to be transported in commerce, including goods at any stage of the supply chain from origin to final destination, whether the goods are moving or temporarily stored. 2. "Cargo theft" includes unlawful taking or appropriating cargo or freight, including theft accomplished through fraud, deception, misrepresentation or identity manipulation, from a commercial motor vehicle, trailer, railcar, intermodal container, warehouse, freight facility, distribution center or other location within the supply chain, whether the cargo is moving in interstate or intrastate commerce. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.